New York, session 2025-2026, S6897.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subparagraph (J) of paragraph 31 of subsection (i) of 2 section 3216 of the insurance law, as added by section 1 of part AA of 3 chapter 57 of the laws of 2024, is amended to read as follows: 4 (J) This subparagraph shall apply to facilities in this state that are 5 licensed, certified, or otherwise authorized by the office of addiction 6 services and supports for the provision of outpatient, intensive outpa- 7 tient, outpatient rehabilitation and opioid treatment that are partic- 8 ipating in the insurer's provider network. Reimbursement for covered 9 outpatient treatment provided by such facilities shall be at rates nego- 10 tiated between the insurer and the participating facility, provided that 11 such rates are not less than the rates that would be paid for such 12 treatment pursuant to the medical assistance program under title eleven 13 of article five of the social services law. For the purposes of this 14 subparagraph, the rates that would be paid for such treatment pursuant 15 to the medical assistance program under title eleven of article five of 16 the social services law shall be set forth in a fee schedule setting 17 forth the specific fee for each individual service covered by this 18 subparagraph published by the office of addiction services and supports 19 by November first of the preceding calendar year and shall be the rates 20 with an effective date of April first of the preceding year, which shall 21 be established prior to October first of the preceding calendar year. 22 Prior to the submission of premium rate filings and applications, the EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD11143-03-5 S. 6897--A 2 1 superintendent shall provide insurers with guidance on factors to 2 consider in calculating the impact of rate changes for the purposes of 3 submitting premium rate filings and applications to the superintendent 4 for the subsequent policy year. To the extent that the rates with an 5 effective date of April first differ from the estimated rates incorpo- 6 rated in premium rate filings and applications, insurers may account for 7 such differences in future premium rate filings and applications submit- 8 ted to the superintendent for approval. 9 § 2. Subparagraph (K) of paragraph 35 of subsection (i) of section 10 3216 of the insurance law, as added by section 2 of part AA of chapter 11 57 of the laws of 2024, is amended to read as follows: 12 (K) This subparagraph shall apply to outpatient treatment provided in 13 a facility issued an operating certificate by the commissioner of mental 14 health pursuant to the provisions of article thirty-one of the mental 15 hygiene law, or in a facility operated by the office of mental health, 16 or in a crisis stabilization center licensed pursuant to section 36.01 17 of the mental hygiene law, that is participating in the insurer's 18 provider network. Reimbursement for covered outpatient treatment 19 provided by such a facility shall be at rates negotiated between the 20 insurer and the participating facility, provided that such rates are not 21 less than the rates that would be paid for such treatment pursuant to 22 the medical assistance program under title eleven of article five of the 23 social services law. For the purposes of this subparagraph, the rates 24 that would be paid for such treatment pursuant to the medical assistance 25 program under title eleven of article five of the social services law 26 shall be set forth in a fee schedule setting forth the specific fee for 27 each individual service covered by this subparagraph published by the 28 office of mental health by November first of the preceding calendar year 29 and shall be the rates with an effective date of April first of the 30 preceding year, which shall be established prior to October first of the 31 preceding calendar year. Prior to the submission of premium rate filings 32 and applications, the superintendent shall provide insurers with guid- 33 ance on factors to consider in calculating the impact of rate changes 34 for the purposes of submitting premium rate filings and applications to 35 the superintendent for the subsequent policy year. To the extent that 36 the rates with an effective date of April first differ from the esti- 37 mated rates incorporated in premium rate filings and applications, 38 insurers may account for such differences in future premium rate filings 39 and applications submitted to the superintendent for approval. 40 § 3. Subparagraph (K) of paragraph 5 of subsection (l) of section 3221 41 of the insurance law, as added by section 3 of part AA of chapter 57 of 42 the laws of 2024, is amended to read as follows: 43 (K) This subparagraph shall apply to outpatient treatment provided in 44 a facility issued an operating certificate by the commissioner of mental 45 health pursuant to the provisions of article thirty-one of the mental 46 hygiene law, or in a facility operated by the office of mental health, 47 or in a crisis stabilization center licensed pursuant to section 36.01 48 of the mental hygiene law, that is participating in the insurer's 49 provider network. Reimbursement for covered outpatient treatment 50 provided by such a facility shall be at rates negotiated between the 51 insurer and the participating facility, provided that such rates are not 52 less than the rates that would be paid for such treatment pursuant to 53 the medical assistance program under title eleven of article five of the 54 social services law. For the purposes of this subparagraph, the rates 55 that would be paid for such treatment pursuant to the medical assistance 56 program under title eleven of article five of the social services law S. 6897--A 3 1 shall be set forth in a fee schedule setting forth the specific fee for 2 each individual service covered by this subparagraph published by the 3 office of mental health by November first of the preceding calendar year 4 and shall be the rates with an effective date of April first of the 5 preceding year, which shall be established prior to October first of the 6 preceding calendar year. Prior to the submission of premium rate filings 7 and applications, the superintendent shall provide insurers with guid- 8 ance on factors to consider in calculating the impact of rate changes 9 for the purposes of submitting premium rate filings and applications to 10 the superintendent for the subsequent policy year. To the extent that 11 the rates with an effective date of April first differ from the esti- 12 mated rates incorporated in premium rate filings and applications, 13 insurers may account for such differences in future premium rate filings 14 and applications submitted to the superintendent for approval. 15 § 4. Subparagraph (J) of paragraph 7 of subsection (l) of section 3221 16 of the insurance law, as added by section 4 of part AA of chapter 57 of 17 the laws of 2024, is amended to read as follows: 18 (J) This subparagraph shall apply to facilities in this state that are 19 licensed, certified, or otherwise authorized by the office of addiction 20 services and supports for the provision of outpatient, intensive outpa- 21 tient, outpatient rehabilitation and opioid treatment that are partic- 22 ipating in the insurer's provider network. Reimbursement for covered 23 outpatient treatment provided by such facilities shall be at rates nego- 24 tiated between the insurer and the participating facility, provided that 25 such rates are not less than the rates that would be paid for such 26 treatment pursuant to the medical assistance program under title eleven 27 of article five of the social services law. For the purposes of this 28 subparagraph, the rates that would be paid for such treatment pursuant 29 to the medical assistance program under title eleven of article five of 30 the social services law shall be set forth in a fee schedule setting 31 forth the specific fee for each individual service covered by this 32 subparagraph published by the office of addiction services and supports 33 by November first of the preceding calendar year and shall be the rates 34 with an effective date of April first of the preceding year, which shall 35 be established prior to October first of the preceding calendar year. 36 Prior to the submission of premium rate filings and applications, the 37 superintendent shall provide insurers with guidance on factors to 38 consider in calculating the impact of rate changes for the purposes of 39 submitting premium rate filings and applications to the superintendent 40 for the subsequent policy year. To the extent that the rates with an 41 effective date of April first differ from the estimated rates incorpo- 42 rated in premium rate filings and applications, insurers may account for 43 such differences in future premium rate filings and applications submit- 44 ted to the superintendent for approval. 45 § 5. Paragraph 12 of subsection (g) of section 4303 of the insurance 46 law, as added by section 5 of part AA of chapter 57 of the laws of 2024, 47 is amended to read as follows: 48 (12) This paragraph shall apply to outpatient treatment provided in a 49 facility issued an operating certificate by the commissioner of mental 50 health pursuant to the provisions of article thirty-one of the mental 51 hygiene law, or in a facility operated by the office of mental health, 52 or in a crisis stabilization center licensed pursuant to section 36.01 53 of the mental hygiene law, that is participating in the corporation's 54 provider network. Reimbursement for covered outpatient treatment 55 provided by such facility shall be at rates negotiated between the 56 corporation and the participating facility, provided that such rates are S. 6897--A 4 1 not less than the rates that would be paid for such treatment pursuant 2 to the medical assistance program under title eleven of article five of 3 the social services law. For the purposes of this paragraph, the rates 4 that would be paid for such treatment pursuant to the medical assistance 5 program under title eleven of article five of the social services law 6 shall be set forth in a fee schedule setting forth the specific fee for 7 each individual service covered by this paragraph published by the 8 office of mental health by November first of the preceding calendar year 9 and shall be the rates with an effective date of April first of the 10 preceding year, which shall be established prior to October first of the 11 preceding calendar year. Prior to the submission of premium rate filings 12 and applications, the superintendent shall provide corporations with 13 guidance on factors to consider in calculating the impact of rate chang- 14 es for the purposes of submitting premium rate filings and applications 15 to the superintendent for the subsequent policy year. To the extent that 16 the rates with an effective date of April first differ from the esti- 17 mated rates incorporated in premium rate filings and applications, 18 corporations may account for such differences in future premium rate 19 filings and applications submitted to the superintendent for approval. 20 § 6. Paragraph 10 of subsection (l) of section 4303 of the insurance 21 law, as added by section 6 of part AA of chapter 57 of the laws of 2024, 22 is amended to read as follows: 23 (10) This paragraph shall apply to facilities in this state that are 24 licensed, certified, or otherwise authorized by the office of addiction 25 services and supports for the provision of outpatient, intensive outpa- 26 tient, outpatient rehabilitation and opioid treatment that are partic- 27 ipating in the corporation's provider network. Reimbursement for covered 28 outpatient treatment provided by such facilities shall be at rates nego- 29 tiated between the corporation and the participating facility, provided 30 that such rates are not less than the rates that would be paid for such 31 treatment pursuant to the medical assistance program under title eleven 32 of article five of the social services law. For the purposes of this 33 paragraph, the rates that would be paid for such treatment pursuant to 34 the medical assistance program under title eleven of article five of the 35 social services law shall be set forth in a fee schedule setting forth 36 the specific fee for each individual service covered by this paragraph 37 published by the office of addiction services and supports by November 38 first of the preceding calendar year and shall be the rates with an 39 effective date of April first of the preceding year, which shall be 40 established prior to October first of the preceding calendar year. Prior 41 to the submission of premium rate filings and applications, the super- 42 intendent shall provide corporations with guidance on factors to consid- 43 er in calculating the impact of rate changes for the purposes of submit- 44 ting premium rate filings and applications to the superintendent for the 45 subsequent policy year. To the extent that the rates with an effective 46 date of April first differ from the estimated rates incorporated in 47 premium rate filings and applications, corporations may account for such 48 differences in future premium rate filings and applications submitted to 49 the superintendent for approval. 50 § 7. This act shall take effect immediately and shall apply to all 51 policies and contracts issued, renewed, modified, altered, or amended on 52 or after such date.